District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

21-1912

Compensation of receiver; interest of absentee in property to cease after fourteen years

Repealed.

History

Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-204, § 3, 34 DCR 632

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 21-1901 to 21-1915.